Hawaii statutes.
§101-20 Notice. When the owner or
claimant of the land sought to be condemned is known, the summons shall be
served by delivering to the owner or claimant, or to an agent authorized by
appointment or by law to receive service of process, a certified copy thereof,
together with a copy of the plaintiff's complaint. If the owner or claimant,
although known, was never a resident of the State or has removed therefrom or
cannot for any reason be served with process within the State, or if the owner
or claimant is unknown, then the service of the summons upon the owner or
claimant may be made in the manner provided by sections 634-23, 634-24, and
634-26. If the defendants are joined in the complaint by describing them as a
class, then the service of the summons upon the defendants may be made by
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the
property is situated, in the manner provided by sections 634-23(3) and 634-26,
and by giving such further notice as the court may order. The service of
summons, as provided for in this section, shall be sufficient to give the court
jurisdiction to proceed with and finally determine the case. [L 1896, c 45, §9;
RL 1925, §818; RL 1935, §60; am L 1937, c 184, §2; am L 1941, c 38, §2; RL
1945, §311; RL 1955, §8-18; am L 1959, c 19, §1; HRS §101-20; am L 1973, c 30,
§1; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Owner of a recorded title is known. 32 H. 745.

Cited: 3 U.S.D.C. Haw. 649, 656.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next